North Dakota, session 69, HB1095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 15.1-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Child safety liaison work group.
1. As used in this section, "child protective services" means an "authorized agent" or the
"department" as the terms are defined under section 50 - 25.1 - 02 .
2. A school district and the corresponding human service zone may designate representatives to
form a child safety liaison work group.
3. The child safety liaison work group:
a. Shall focus on child safety issues, including:
(1) The roles and responsibilities of child protective services and mandatory reporters;
(2) Opportunities for improved relations between the human service zone and school
district; and
(3) The coordination of services for children and families.
b. Must be proportional in member size to the need and population served, and have an
equal number of representatives from the school district and human service zone.
c. Shall meet at least twice annually.
d. Shall report to the human service zone board, the school board, and the children's
cabinet by July thirty-first of each year. The report must include recommendations,
proposed solutions, progress, training needs, and identified gaps in service coordination.
4. The human service zone is responsible for coordinating the child safety liaison work group
meetings.

H. B. NO. 1095 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1095.
House Vote: Yeas 73 Nays 18 Absent 3
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 3 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State